Utah statutes.
13-42-116.   Customer service.

A provider that is required to be registered under this chapter shall maintain a toll-free communication system, staffed at a level that reasonably permits an individual to speak to a certified counselor or customer service representative, as appropriate, during ordinary business hours.

